de: Reinigungsformel: Auf Alkoholbasis; Auf Chlorbasis; Auf Zitrusbasis; Enzymatisch; Auf Wasserstoffperoxid-Basis; Pflanzenbasiert; Quartäre Ammoniumverbindung (Quat); Tensidbasiert; Sonstige
da: Rengøringsformel: Alkoholbaseret; Klorbaseret; Citrusbaseret; Enzymatisk; Brintoveriltebaseret; Plantebaseret; Kvartær ammonium (quat); Tensidbaseret; Andet
es: Fórmula de limpieza: A base de alcohol; A base de cloro; A base de cítricos; Enzimática; A base de peróxido de hidrógeno; De origen vegetal; Amonio cuaternario; A base de tensioactivos; Otro
nb: Rengjøringsformel: Alkoholbasert; Klorbasert; Sitrusbasert; Enzymatisk; Hydrogenperoksidbasert; Plantebasert; Kvartær ammonium (quat); Tensidbasert; Annen
ja: 洗浄成分: アルコールベース; 塩素ベース; 柑橘系ベース; 酵素; 過酸化水素ベース; 植物ベース; 第四級アンモニウム (quat); 界面活性剤ベース; その他
fi: Puhdistuskaava: Alkoholipohjainen; Klooripohjainen; Sitruspohjainen; Entsymaattinen; Vetyperoksidipohjainen; Kasvipohjainen; Kvaternaarinen ammonium (quat); Tensidipohjainen; Muu
sv: Rengöringsformel: Alkoholbaserad; Klorbaserad; Citrusbaserad; Enzymatisk; Väteperoxidbaserad; Växtbaserad; Kvartär ammoniumförening (quat); Tensidbaserad; Annan
sl-SI: Čistilna formula: Na alkoholni osnovi; Na osnovi klora; Na osnovi citrusov; Encimska; Na osnovi vodikovega peroksida; Na rastlinski osnovi; Kvartarne amonijeve spojine (quat); Na osnovi površinsko aktivnih snovi; Drugo
nl: Reinigingsformule: Op alcoholbasis; Op chloorbasis; Op citrusbasis; Enzymatisch; Op basis van waterstofperoxide; Plantaardig; Quaternaire ammoniumverbinding (quat); Op basis van oppervlakte-actieve stoffen; Anders
zh-TW: 清潔配方: 酒精基底; 氯基底; 柑橘基底; 酵素; 雙氧水基底; 植物基底; 四級銨; 界面活性劑基底; 其他
th: สูตรทำความสะอาด: มีส่วนผสมของแอลกอฮอล์; มีส่วนผสมของคลอรีน; มีส่วนผสมของซิตรัส; เอนไซม์; มีส่วนผสมของไฮโดรเจนเปอร์ออกไซด์; แพลนต์เบส; ควอเทอร์นารีแอมโมเนียม (Quat); มีส่วนผสมของสารลดแรงตึงผิว; อื่นๆ
tr: Temizleme formülü: Alkol bazlı; Klor bazlı; Narenciye bazlı; Enzimatik; Hidrojen peroksit bazlı; Bitki bazlı; Kuarterner amonyum (quat); Sürfaktan bazlı; Diğer
zh-CN: 清洁配方: 醇基; 氯基; 柑橘基; 酶基; 过氧化氢基; 植物基; 季铵盐（quat）; 表面活性剂基; 其他
vi: Công thức làm sạch: Gốc cồn; Gốc clo; Gốc cam chanh; Enzyme; Gốc hydrogen peroxide; Gốc thực vật; Hợp chất amoni bậc 4 (quat); Gốc chất hoạt động bề mặt; Khác
en: Cleaning formula: Alcohol-based; Chlorine-based; Citrus-based; Enzymatic; Hydrogen peroxide-based; Plant-based; Quaternary ammonium (quat); Surfactant-based; Other
lt-LT: Valymo formulė: Alkoholio pagrindo; Chloro pagrindo; Citrusinių vaisių pagrindo; Fermentinė; Vandenilio peroksido pagrindo; Augalinio pagrindo; Ketvirtinis amonis (quat); Paviršiaus aktyviųjų medžiagų pagrindo; Kita
pl: Formuła środka czyszczącego: Na bazie alkoholu; Na bazie chloru; Na bazie cytrusów; Enzymatyczna; Na bazie nadtlenku wodoru; Na bazie roślin; Na bazie czwartorzędowych związków amoniowych (QAC); Na bazie środków powierzchniowo czynnych; Inna
cs: Složení čisticího prostředku: Na bázi alkoholu; Na bázi chloru; Na bázi citrusů; Enzymatické; Na bázi peroxidu vodíku; Rostlinného původu; Kvartérní amoniové soli (QAC); Na bázi tenzidů; Jiné
el: Φόρμουλα καθαρισμού: Με βάση το οινόπνευμα; Με βάση το χλώριο; Με βάση τα εσπεριδοειδή; Ενζυματικό; Με βάση το υπεροξείδιο του υδρογόνου; Φυτικής προέλευσης; Τεταρτοταγές αμμώνιο (quat); Με βάση τα επιφανειοδραστικά; Άλλο
pt-PT: Fórmula de limpeza: À base de álcool; À base de cloro; À base de citrinos; Enzimático; À base de peróxido de hidrogénio; À base de plantas; Amónio quaternário (quat); À base de tensioativos; Outro
bg-BG: Почистваща формула: На алкохолна основа; На хлорна основа; На цитрусова основа; Ензимна; На основата на водороден пероксид; На растителна основа; Кватернерни амониеви съединения (quat); На основата на повърхностноактивни вещества; Друго
hu: Tisztító formula: Alkoholalapú; Klóralapú; Citrusos alapú; Enzimes; Hidrogén-peroxid-alapú; Növényi alapú; Kvarterner ammónium (quat); Felületaktív anyag alapú; Egyéb
it: Formula detergente: A base di alcol; A base di cloro; Agli agrumi; Enzimatico; A base di perossido di idrogeno; A base vegetale; Ammonio quaternario; A base di tensioattivi; Altro
fr: Formule de nettoyage: À base d’alcool; À base de chlore; À base d’agrumes; Enzymatique; À base de peroxyde d’hydrogène; À base de plantes; Ammonium quaternaire (quat); À base de tensioactifs; Autre
hr-HR: Formula za čišćenje: Na bazi alkohola; Na bazi klora; Na bazi citrusa; Enzimatsko; Na bazi vodikova peroksida; Na biljnoj bazi; Kvartarni amonij (quat); Na bazi površinski aktivnih tvari; Ostalo
ko: 세척액: 알코올 기반; 염소 기반; 감귤류 기반; 효소; 과산화수소 기반; 식물성 기반; 4급 암모늄(quat); 계면활성제 기반; 기타
ro-RO: Formulă de curățare: Pe bază de alcool; Pe bază de clor; Pe bază de citrice; Enzimatic; Pe bază de peroxid de hidrogen; Pe bază de plante; Amoniu cuaternar (quat); Pe bază de agenți tensioactivi; Altele
sk-SK: Recept na čistenie: Na báze alkoholu; Na báze chlóru; Na báze citrusov; Enzymatický; Na báze peroxidu vodíka; Na rastlinnej báze; Kvartérne amóniové zlúčeniny (KAZ); Na báze povrchovo aktívnych látok; Iné
pt-BR: Fórmula de limpeza: À base de álcool; À base de cloro; À base de frutas cítricas; Enzimático; À base de peróxido de hidrogênio; À base de plantas; Amônio quaternário (quat); À base de surfactante; Outro
ru: Формула чистящего средства: На спиртовой основе; На основе хлора; На основе цитрусовых; Ферментная; На основе перекиси водорода; На растительной основе; Четвертичный аммоний (ЧАС); На основе ПАВ; Другая